Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-8,301
Acceptance of award; effect.

Any award made under the State Contract Claims Act, the State Miscellaneous Claims Act, the In the Line of Duty Compensation Act, or section 25-1806 or 66-1531 and accepted by the claimant shall be final and conclusive on all officers of the State of Nebraska except when procured by means of fraud. The acceptance by the claimant of such award shall be final and conclusive on the claimant and shall constitute a complete release by the claimant of any claim against the state and against the employee of the state whose act or omission gave rise to the claim by reason of the same subject matter.

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 51;

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 38;

Laws 2021, LB255, § 9.

In the Line of Duty Compensation Act, see section 81-8,315.

State Contract Claims Act, see section 81-8,302.